Oklahoma, session 2025, SB824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-601 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Assign” or “assignment” means a financial institution’s


policy, process, or practice that labels, links, or otherwise


associates a firearms code with a merchant or payment card


transaction in a manner that allows the financial institution or any


other entity facilitating or processing the payment card transaction

Req. No. 458 Page 1


to identify whether a merchant is a firearms retailer or whether a


transaction involves the sale of firearms or ammunition;


2. “Customer” means any person who presents a payment card to a


merchant for the purchase of goods or services;


3. “Customer’s protected financial information” refers to


protected financial information appearing in the financial records


of a customer;


4. “Disclosure” means the transfer, publication, or


distribution of protected financial information to another person


for any purpose other than to process or facilitate a payment card


transaction;


5. “Financial institution” means an entity other than a


merchant involved in facilitating or processing a payment card


transaction, including, but not limited to, a bank, acquirer,


gateway, payment card network, or payment card issuer;


6. “Financial record” means a financial record held by a


financial institution related to a payment card transaction that the


financial institution has processed or facilitated;


7. “Firearms retailer” means any person engaged in the lawful


business of selling or trading firearms or ammunition to be used in


firearms;


8. “Firearms code” means any code or other indicator a


financial institution assigns to a merchant or to a payment card


transaction that identifies whether a merchant is a firearms

Req. No. 458 Page 2


retailer or whether the payment card transaction involves the


purchase of a firearm or ammunition. The term shall include, but is


not limited to, a merchant category code assigned to a retailer by a


payment card network or other financial institution;


9. “Government entity” means any state agency or political


subdivision or agency thereof located in this state;


10. “Merchant” means a person or entity that accepts payment


cards from customers for the purchase of goods or services. The


term shall include a firearms retailer that accepts payment cards


for the lawful purchase of firearms or ammunition;


11. “Payment card” means a credit card, charge card, debit


card, or any other card that is issued to an authorized card user


and that allows the user to purchase goods or services from a


merchant; and


12. “Protected financial information” means any record of a


sale, purchase, return, or refund involving a payment card that is


retrieved, characterized, generated, labeled, sorted, or grouped


based on the assignment of a firearms code.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-602 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A financial institution shall be prohibited from disclosing a


customer’s protected financial information and a government entity


is prohibited from accessing or obtaining the information unless:

Req. No. 458 Page 3


1. Otherwise required by law and the protected financial


information is not singled out, segregated, or disclosed based on


the assignment of a firearms code;


2. Disclosure is made pursuant to a valid warrant issued in a


criminal investigation, stating the grounds or probable cause for


its issuance;


3. The customer has provided written authorization for


disclosure, as provided in Section 3 of this act; or


4. Disclosure is made pursuant to a subpoena or to a grand jury


subpoena.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-603 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A financial institution may disclose a customer’s protected


financial information if the customer provides the financial


institution with written authorization for the disclosure. The


written authorization described by this section shall contain the


following:


1. A statement that the customer consents to the disclosure of


the protected financial information for a specific period;


2. A statement that the customer has the right to refuse to


consent to disclosure;





Req. No. 458 Page 4


3. A statement that the customer understands his or her right


to revoke the consent at any time before the protected financial


information is disclosed;


4. A description of the financial records authorized to be


disclosed;


5. The purpose for which disclosure of the protected financial


information is authorized; and


6. The customer’s signature.


B. The written authorization described in this section shall


not be required as a condition of doing business or transacting with


any financial institution.


C. The written authorization required by this section shall be


executed distinctly and separately from other agreements or


instruments entered into between the customer and financial


institution.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-604 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


If a subpoena issued by a government entity requires disclosure


of a customer’s protected financial information, a financial


institution shall only disclose the information if the subpoena


meets the following requirements:


1. The subpoena shall state that protected financial


information is being sought; and

Req. No. 458 Page 5


2. A copy of the subpoena shall be served to the customer


according to the procedure provided in Section 3 of this act and the


subpoena shall contain a certification that the service was


executed.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-605 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A financial institution shall not use a firearms code to engage


in the following discriminatory conduct:


1. Declining a lawful payment card transaction based on the


assignment of a firearms code to the merchant or transaction;


2. Limiting or declining to do business with a customer,


potential customer, or merchant based on the assignment of a


firearms code to previous lawful transactions involving the


customer, potential customer, or merchant;


3. Charging a higher transaction or interchange fee to a


merchant or for a lawful transaction, as compared to the fee charged


to a similarly situated merchant or for a similar transaction, based


on the assignment of a firearms code; or


4. Taking any action against a customer or merchant that is


intended to suppress lawful commerce involving firearms or


ammunition.





Req. No. 458 Page 6


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-606 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A customer may bring a civil action for damages against any


financial institution or government entity that causes the


customer’s protected financial information to be disclosed in


violation of this act. For each violation, the individual may


recover:


1. Against any person who negligently or recklessly violates


this act, damages of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or actual


damages, whichever is greater; and


2. Against any person who intentionally violates this act,


damages of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or actual


damages, whichever is greater.


B. A customer or merchant aggrieved by a violation of Section 5


of this act may bring a civil action for damages. The person may


recover damages of Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) or actual


damages, whichever is greater.


C. If a court finds that a violation of this act has occurred


as the result of a civil action filed pursuant to subsection A or B


of this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees to


the aggrieved party. A court may order other relief, including an


injunction, as the court considers appropriate.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

Req. No. 458 Page 7




60-1-458 QD 1/19/2025 5:44:09 AM













































Req. No. 458 Page 8